Utah statutes.
78B-4-102.   Liability protection for volunteers -- Exceptions.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), no volunteer providing services for
a nonprofit organization incurs any legal liability for any act or omission of
the volunteer while providing services for the nonprofit organization and no
volunteer incurs any personal financial liability for any tort claim or other
action seeking damage for an injury arising from any act or omission of the
volunteer while providing services for the nonprofit organization if:
(a)  the individual was acting in good faith and reasonably believed he was
acting within the scope of his official functions and duties with the
nonprofit organization; and
(b)  the damage or injury was not caused by an intentional or knowing act by
the volunteer which constitutes illegal, willful, or wanton misconduct.
(2)  The protection against volunteer liability provided by this section does
not apply:
(a)  to injuries resulting from a volunteer's operation of a motor vehicle, a
vessel, aircraft or other vehicle for which a pilot or operator's license is
required;
(b)  when a suit is brought by an authorized officer of a state or local
government to enforce a federal, state, or local law; or
(c)  where the nonprofit organization for which the volunteer is working fails
to provide a financially secure source of recovery for individuals who suffer
injuries as a result of actions taken by the volunteer on behalf of the
nonprofit organization.
(3)  Nothing in this section shall bar an action by a volunteer against an
organization, its officers, or other persons who intentionally or knowingly
misrepresent that a financially secure source of recovery does or will exist
during a period when such a source does not or will not in fact exist.
(4)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to place a duty upon a
nonprofit organization to provide a financially secure source of recovery.
(5)  The granting of immunity from liability to a volunteer under this section
does not affect the liability of the nonprofit organization providing the
financially secure source of recovery.
